Tennessee, session 114, SB0793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before July 1, 2025, the commissioner of health shall report to the
chairs of the health and welfare committee of the senate and the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over health-related matters on the standards and policies for
assisted reproductive technology in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0793
002528
- 1 -